Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-361
Department; powers.

The department may administer and enforce the International Registration Plan Act and the Motor Vehicle Registration Act.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 61.

International Registration Plan Act, see section 60-3,192.